Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.380

Disciplinary action—Hearing—Conduct of.

The hearing officer shall cause a transcript of all adjudicative proceedings to be kept by a reporter and shall upon request after completion thereof, furnish a copy of the transcript to the licensed person or applicant accused in the proceedings at the expense of the licensee or applicant. The hearing officer shall certify the transcript of proceedings to be true and correct. If the director finds that the statement or accusation is not proved by a fair preponderance of evidence, the director shall notify the licensee or applicant and the person making the accusation and shall dismiss the case.

[ 2008 c 23 s 34; 2002 c 86 s 231; 1987 c 332 s 12; 1951 c 222 s 24. Formerly RCW 18.85.261.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.